src/morphology/stems/pronouns.lexc
!! !!!Pronouns
! --------
!! Pronouns in Evenki denote references to things.

! э̄ а̄ ӣ о̄ ӯ ю̄ я̄ е̄
LEXICON Pronouns

Personal ;
Reflexive ;
Possessive ;
Determinative ;
Interrogative ;

LEXICON Personal 
 pers_nom ;
 pers_obl ;
      
LEXICON pers_nom
бӣ+Pron+Pers+Sg1+Nom:би%{ː%} # ;
бӯ+Pron+Pers+Pl1+Nom:бу%{ː%} # ;
мит+Pron+Pers+Pl12+Nom:мит # ;
сӣ+Pron+Pers+Sg2+Nom:си%{ː%} # ;
сӯ+Pron+Pers+Pl2+Nom:су%{ː%} # ;
нуӈан+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Nom:нуӈан # ;
нуӈартын+Pron+Pers+Pl3+Nom:нуӈартын # ;

LEXICON pers_acc
бӣ+Pron+Pers+Sg1+Acc+Def:минэвэ 	 # ;
бӯ+Pron+Pers+Pl1+Acc+Def:мунэвэ 	 # ;
мит+Pron+Pers+Pl21+Acc+Def:митвэ 	 # ;
сӣ+Pron+Pers+Sg2+Acc+Def:синэвэ 	 # ;
сӯ+Pron+Pers+Pl2+Acc+Def:сунэвэ 	 # ;
нуӈан+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Acc+Def:нуӈанма̄н  #  ;
нуӈартан+Pron+Pers+Pl3+Acc+Def:нуӈарватын  # ;

LEXICON pers_obl
бӣ+Pron+Pers+Sg1:мин 	PERS_CASE_OBL_LN ;
бӣ+Pron+Pers+Pl1:мун 	PERS_CASE_OBL_LN ;
мит+Pron+Pers+Pl12:мит 	PERS_CASE_OBL_MIT ;
сӣ+Pron+Pers+Sg2:син 	PERS_CASE_OBL_LN ;
сӯ+Pron+Pers+Pl2:сун 	PERS_CASE_OBL_LN ;
нуӈан+Pron+Pers+Sg3:нуӈан  PERS_CASE_OBL_3SG ;
нуӈартан+Pron+Pers+Pl3:нуӈар  PERS_CASE_OBL_3PL ;

LEXICON PERS_CASE_OBL_MIT
+Acc+Def:%>вэ # ;
+Acc+Ind:%>ъэ # ;
PERS_CASE_OBL_COMMON; 

LEXICON PERS_CASE_OBL_LN 
+Acc+Def:%>эвэ # ;
+Acc+Ind:%>э # ;
PERS_CASE_OBL_COMMON; 

LEXICON PERS_CASE_OBL_COMMON
+Dat:%>%{D%}у%{ː%} # ;		 ! Дателный Dative
+Loc:%>лэ{ː%} # ;         ! Местный Locative
+All:%>тки{ː%} # ;            ! Направителый Allative
+Prl:%>%{D%}ули{ː%} # ;            ! Продольный Prolative
+Ter:%>%{i%}клэ%{ː%} # ;    ! Направительно-местный Terminative
+Dir:%>%{i%}кли%{ː%} # ;        ! Направительно-продольный Directive
+Abl:%>%{D%}ук # ;		 ! Отложительный Ablative
+Ela:%>%{G%}ит # ;		 ! Исходный Elative
+Com:%>нун # ;        ! Совместный Comitative

LEXICON PERS_CASE_OBL_3SG 
+Acc+Def:%>ма%{ː%}н # ;
+Acc+Ind:%>а # ;
+Dat:%>ду%{ː%}н # ;		 ! Дателный Dative
+Loc:%>дул%а{ː%}н # ;         ! Местный Locative
+All:%>тыки{ː%}н # ;            ! Направителый Allative
+Prl:%>дули{ː%}н # ;            ! Продольный Prolative
+Ter:%>икла%{ː%}н # ;    ! Направительно-местный Terminative
+Dir:%>икли%{ː%}н # ;        ! Направительно-продольный Directive
+Abl:%>дукин # ;		 ! Отложительный Ablative
+Ela:%>ӈидин # ;		 ! Исходный Elative
+Ins:%>дин # ;		 ! Творительный Instrumental
+Com:%>нунин # ;        ! Совместный Comitative

LEXICON PERS_CASE_OBL_3PL 
+Acc+Def:%>vа%{ː%}тын # ;
+Acc+Ind:%>ъя # ;
+Dat:%>ду%{ː%}тын # ;		 ! Дателный Dative
+Loc:%>дул%а{ː%}тын # ;         ! Местный Locative
+All:%>тыки{ː%}тын # ;            ! Направителый Allative
+Prl:%>дули{ː%}тын # ;            ! Продольный Prolative
+Ter:%>икла%{ː%}тын # ;    ! Направительно-местный Terminative
+Dir:%>икли%{ː%}тын # ;        ! Направительно-продольный Directive
+Abl:%>дукитын # ;		 ! Отложительный Ablative
+Ela:%>ӈидитын # ;		 ! Исходный Elative
+Ins:%>дитын # ;		 ! Творительный Instrumental
+Com:%>нунитын # ;        ! Совместный Comitative

LEXICON Reflexive
мэ%{ː%}нми%{ː%}+Pers+Refl+Sg:мэ%{ː%}н reflcasesg ;
мэ%{ː%}рвэр+Pers+Refl+Sg:мэ%{ː%}р reflcasepl ;

LEXICON reflcasesg
+Acc+Def:%>м%{ː%} # ;
+Dat:%>%{D%}у%{ː%}ви%{ː%} # ;		 ! Дателный Dative
+Loc:%>л%{A%}{ː%}ви%{ː%} # ;         ! Местный Locative
+All:%>тки{ː%}ви%{ː%} # ;            ! Направителый Allative
+Prl:%>%{D%}ули{ː%}ви%{ː%} # ;            ! Продольный Prolative
+Ter:%>иклэ%{ː%}ви%{ː%} # ;    ! Направительно-местный Terminative
+Dir:%>икли%{ː%}ви%{ː%} # ;        ! Направительно-продольный Directive
+Abl:%>%{D%}укви%{ː%} # ;		 ! Отложительный Ablative
+Abl:%>%{D%}укки%{ː%} # ;		 ! Отложительный Ablative
+Ela:%>ӈитпи%{ː%} # ;		 ! Исходный Elative
+Ins:%>дивии%{ː%} # ;		 ! Творительный Instrumental
+Com:%>нунми%{ː%} # ;        ! Совместный Comitative

LEXICON reflcasepl
+Acc+Def:%>вэр # ;
+Dat:%>%{D%}у%{ː%}вэр # ;		 ! Дателный Dative
+Loc:%>л%{A%}{ː%}вэр # ;         ! Местный Locative
+All:%>тки{ː%}вэр # ;            ! Направителый Allative
+Prl:%>%{D%}ули{ː%}вэр # ;            ! Продольный Prolative
+Ter:%>иклэ%{ː%}вэр # ;    ! Направительно-местный Terminative
+Dir:%>икли%{ː%}вэр # ;        ! Направительно-продольный Directive
+Abl:%>%{D%}уквэр # ;		 ! Отложительный Ablative
+Abl:%>%{D%}уккэр # ;		 ! Отложительный Ablative
+Ela:%>ӈитпэр # ;		 ! Исходный Elative
+Ins:%>дивиэр # ;		 ! Творительный Instrumental
+Com:%>нунмэр # ;        ! Совместный Comitative

LEXICON Possessive
минӈӣ+Pron+Poss+Sg1:минӈи%{ː%} # ;
мунӈӣ+Pron+Poss+Pl1:мунӈи%{ː%} # ;
митӈӣ+Pron+Poss+Pl12:митӈи%{ː%} # ;
синӈӣ+Pron+Poss+Sg2:синӈи%{ː%} # ;
сунӈӣ+Pron+Poss+Pl2:сунӈи%{ː%} # ;

LEXICON Determinative

а̄ды̄+Det:а%{ː%}ды%{ː%} # ; !"сколько"
асӯн+Det:асу%{ː%}н # ; !"сколько"


эр+Det+Sg+Nom:эр	    # ;
эр+Det+Sg+Acc+Def:эрэвэ # ;
эр+Det+Sg+Dat:эрэ	    # ;
эр+Det+Sg+Loc:эду%{ː%}	    # ;
эр+Det+Sg+All:элэ%{ː%}	    # ;
эр+Det+Sg+Prl:эртыки%{ː%}	    # ;
эр+Det+Sg+Ter:эли%{ː%}	    # ;
эр+Det+Sg+Dir:эриклэ%{ː%}	    # ;
эр+Det+Sg+Abl:эрикли%{ː%}	    # ;
эр+Det+Sg+Abl:эдук	    # ;
эр+Det+Sg+Ela:эргит	    # ;
эр+Det+Sg+Ins:эрит	    # ;
эр+Det+Sg+Com:эрнун	    # ;

эр+Det+Pl+Nom:эрил	    # ;
эр+Det+Pl+Acc+Def:эрилвэ # ;
эр+Det+Pl+Dat:эрилэ	    # ;
эр+Det+Pl+Loc:эрилду%{ː%}	    # ;
эр+Det+Pl+All:эрилдулэ%{ː%}	    # ;
эр+Det+Pl+Prl:эрилтыки%{ː%}	    # ;
эр+Det+Pl+Ter:эрили%{ː%}	    # ;
эр+Det+Pl+Dir:эриликлэ%{ː%}	    # ;
эр+Det+Pl+Abl:эриликли%{ː%}	    # ;
эр+Det+Pl+Abl:эрилдук	    # ;
эр+Det+Pl+Ela:эрилгит	    # ;
эр+Det+Pl+Ins:эрилди	    # ;
эр+Det+Pl+Com:эрилнун	    # ;

тар+Det+Sg+Nom:тар	    # ;
тар+Det+Sg+Acc+Def:тарва # ;
тар+Det+Sg+Dat:тара	    # ;
тар+Det+Sg+Loc:тарду%{ː%}	    # ;
тар+Det+Sg+All:тарда%{ː%}	    # ;
тар+Det+Sg+Prl:тартыки%{ː%}	    # ;
тар+Det+Sg+Ter:тарли%{ː%}	    # ;
тар+Det+Sg+Dir:тарикла%{ː%}	    # ;
тар+Det+Sg+Abl:тарикли%{ː%}	    # ;
тар+Det+Sg+Abl:тадук	    # ;
тар+Det+Sg+Ela:таргит	    # ;
тар+Det+Sg+Ins:тарит	    # ;
тар+Det+Sg+Com:тарнун	    # ;

тар+Det+Pl+Nom:тарил	    # ;
тар+Det+Pl+Acc+Def:тарилва # ;
тар+Det+Pl+Dat:тарила	    # ;
тар+Det+Pl+Loc:тарилду%{ː%}	    # ;
тар+Det+Pl+All:тарилдула%{ː%}	    # ;
тар+Det+Pl+Prl:тарилтыки%{ː%}	    # ;
тар+Det+Pl+Ter:тарилли%{ː%}	    # ;
тар+Det+Pl+Dir:тариликла%{ː%}	    # ;
тар+Det+Pl+Abl:тариликли%{ː%}	    # ;
тар+Det+Pl+Abl:тадук	    # ;
тар+Det+Pl+Ela:тарилгит	    # ;
тар+Det+Pl+Ins:тарилит	    # ;
тар+Det+Pl+Com:тарилнун	    # ;

упкат+Det:упкат # ;
ӈи-вэл+Det:ӈи-вэл # ; !"somebody"
экун-мал+Det:экун-мал # ; !"something"


LEXICON Interrogative
ӈӣ+Pron+Interr:ӈи%{ː%} PronV ; !"who"
экун+Pron+Pers:экун PronR ; !"what"
экур+Pron+Pers:экур PronN ; !"what"

LEXICON PronV

+Sg+Nom:	    # ;
+Sg+Acc+Def:вэ # ;
+Sg+Acc:e # ;
+Sg+Dat:ду%{ː%}	    # ;
+Sg+Loc:ла%{ː%}	    # ;
+Sg+All:тки%{ː%}	    # ;
+Sg+Prl:ли%{ː%}	    # ;
+Sg+Ter:кла%{ː%}	    # ;
+Sg+Dir:кли%{ː%}	    # ;
+Sg+Abl:дук	    # ;
+Sg+Ela:гит	    # ;
+Sg+Ins:т	    # ;
+Sg+Com:нун	    # ;
+Pl+Nom:л	    # ;
+Pl+Acc+Def:лвэ # ;
+Pl+Acc:лe # ;
+Pl+Dat:лду%{ː%}	    # ;
+Pl+Loc:лла%{ː%}	    # ;
+Pl+All:лтыки%{ː%}	    # ;
+Pl+Prl:лдули%{ː%}	    # ;
+Pl+Ter:ликла%{ː%}	    # ;
+Pl+Dir:ликли%{ː%}	    # ;
+Pl+Abl:лдук	    # ;
+Pl+Ela:лгит	    # ;
+Pl+Ins:лт	    # ;
+Pl+Com:лнун	    # ;

LEXICON PronR
#;
LEXICON PronN
#;

! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
